sl-SI: Slog konice: Pod kotom; Ukrivljena; Ravna; Koničasta; Drugo
es: Estilo de punta: Angular; Curva; Puro; En punta; Otros
nl: Tipstijl: Hoekig; Gebogen; Vlak; Puntig; Andere
nb: Tuppstil: Vinklet; Buet; Flat; Spiss; Annet
en: Tip style: Angled; Curved; Flat; Pointed; Other
hu: Hegy stílusa: Szögletes; Ívelt; Lapos; Hegyes; Egyéb
cs: Styl koncovky: Úhlový; Zaoblený; Plochý; Špičatý; Jiné
da: Spidsstil: Vinklet; Buet; Flad; Spids; Andet
pl: Styl końcówki: Kątowe; Zakrzywiony; Płaski; Spiczasty; Inne
vi: Kiểu đầu: Có góc; Cong; Phẳng; Mũi giày nhọn; Khác
ro-RO: Stil vârf: Unghiular; Curbat; Plat; Ascuțit; Altele
hr-HR: Izgled vrha: Pod kutom; Zaobljeni; Ravni; Zašiljeni; Ostalo
sv: Spetsstil: Vinklad; Böjd; Platt; Spetsig; Övrigt
lt-LT: Antgalio stilius: Kampinis; Lenktas; Plokščias; Smailas; Kita
de: Spitzenstil: Abgewinkelt; Gebogen; Flach; Spitz; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Стил на накрайник: Ъглов; Извит; Плосък; Заострен; Други
ja: 先端のスタイル: アングルド; カーブド; フラット; ポインテッド; その他
sk-SK: Štýl špičky: Uhlový; Zaoblený; Rovný; Špicatý; Iné
pt-BR: Estilo de ponta: Angular; Curvada; Plana; Pontiagudo; Outro
ko: 팁 스타일: 각진; 곡선형; 플랫; 포인티드; 기타
ru: Тип наконечника: Угловой; Изогнутый; Плоский; Заостренный; Другой
fr: Style de la pointe: Inclinée; Incurvée; Plate; Pointu; Autre
it: Stile della punta: Angolata; Curvo; Piatto; Appuntita; Altro
tr: Uç Stili: Açılı; Kavisli; Düz; Sivri; Diğer
zh-CN: 尖端款式: 有角度的; 弯曲的; 扁平的; 尖头; 其他
el: Στυλ άκρου (μύτης): Υπό γωνία; Καμπυλωτή; Επίπεδη; Αιχμηρή; Άλλο
th: สไตล์ส่วนปลาย: ทำมุม; โค้ง; ราบ; ทรงแหลม; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 尖端樣式: 有角度; 弧形; 平坦; 尖頭; 其他
pt-PT: Estilo de ponta: Angular; Curvado; Plano; Pontiagudo; Outro
fi: Kärjen tyyli: Kulmikas; Kaareva; Tasainen; Teräväkärkinen; Muu